tex/context/patterns/lang-sk.pat
5s4l[aacute]v
5s4led
5s4lep
5s4lovn
5s4love
5s4lova
5s4lovk
5s4luh
5s4l[uacute][zcaron]
5s4[lcaron]ub
5s4ma[zcaron]
5s4mel
5s4mer
5s4piev
5s4pev
5s4por
5s4potreb
5s4p4ravod
5s4p4raved
5s4p4r[aacute]vn
5s4p4ravo
5s4tarost
5s4tatic
5s4tav
5s4t4rach
5s4t4ran
5s4t4r[aacute]n
5s4t4r[aacute]da
5s4t4ra[scaron]
5s4t2rat
5s4t2red
5s4t2rek
5s4t4rel
5s4t4re[lcaron]
5s4t4riel
5s4t4rie[lcaron]
5s4t4rih
5s4t4ri[zcaron]
5s4t4rom
5s4t4r[uacute]h
5s4t4run
5s4t4ru[zcaron]
5s4tati
5d2ve5s4to
5t2ri5s4to
5[scaron]4tyri5s4to
5p[adiaeresis][tcaron]5s4to
5[scaron]es4[tcaron]5s4to
5sedem5s4to
5osem5s4to
5dev[adiaeresis][tcaron]5s4to
5p[adiaeresis][tcaron]5
5[scaron]es4[tcaron]5
5s4t4la
5s4tup
5s4ved
5[scaron]4[lcaron]ah
5[scaron]4liap
5[scaron]4kola
5[scaron]4k4rab
5[scaron]4k4rie
5[scaron]4pin
5[scaron]4p4liech
5[scaron]4print
5[scaron]4tart
5[scaron]4t[aacute]t
5[scaron]4tep
5[scaron]4t[iacute]t
5[scaron]4t4rukt[uacute]r
5[scaron]4tude
5[scaron]4tudo
5[scaron]4t4vera
5[scaron]4t4vorec
5[scaron]4tyli
5[scaron]4[tcaron]ast
5[scaron]tiep4
5[scaron]4t4v4r4[tcaron]5k4
5[scaron]4t4v4r4[tcaron]5l4
5[scaron]4t4v4r4[tcaron]5r4
5[scaron]4t4v4r4[tcaron]5s4
5t4la[ccaron]
5t4lak
5t4ran4s5
5t4ras
5t4resk
5t4retin
5t4ried
5t4rub
5t4r4vaj
5t4r4val
5t4r4van
5uholn[iacute]k
5uho[lcaron]n
5viac5h4
5v4[ccaron]era
5v4l[aacute]d
5v4las
5v4r[aacute]s
5v4rav
5v4rat
5v4r[aacute]t
5v4[scaron]imn
5v4t[aacute]k
5v4tip
5vy5s4t4r[aacute]ja
5v4z4du
5v4z4[tcaron]ah
5v4z4[tcaron]a[zcaron]
5z4lom
5z4lu[ccaron]
5z4mysel
5z4mysl
5z4nak
5z4n[aacute]m
5z4n[aacute][scaron]a
5z4rak
5z4v[adiaeresis]z
5z4vest
5zv4es[tcaron]
5z4vod
5z4vuk
5z4vu[ccaron]
5[zcaron]4r[aacute][ccaron]
5[zcaron]4rane
5[zcaron]4reb
5[zcaron]4r[uacute]t
.cv6
.ch6
.sp6
.st6
.[scaron]k6
.[scaron]p6
.[scaron]t6
.tk6
.uh6
.uc6h6
.uk6
.um6
.up6
.us6
.[uacute]s6
.usc6h6
.[uacute]sc6h
.usk6
.[uacute]sl6
.usm6
.[uacute]sm6
.[uacute]s7ta.
.[uacute]s7tami.
.[uacute]s7to[ccaron]
.[uacute]s7ti
.ust6l
.[uacute]st7ny
.ust6r
.[uacute]s7tret
.us7t4ric
.[uacute]s6t6r
.[uacute][scaron]6
.ut6
.uv6
.uz6
.vd6
.vh6
.vk6
.vp6
.vs6
.v[scaron]6
.vt6
.vz6
.vzh6
.vzk6
.vzl6
.vzp6
.v[zcaron]6
.zb6
.zd6n
.zd6r
.zd6v
.zg6
.zh6
.zm6
.zr6
.zv6
4b4s4[tcaron].
8c4h.
8d4z.
8d4[zcaron].
4c4ht4.
4j4s4[tcaron].
4lt.
4m4p4r.
4m4p4s.
4m4[scaron]4t.
4n4k4t.
4p4r4v.
4rd.
r4p4t.
r4[scaron]4[ccaron].
r4t4z.
4st.
4s[tcaron].
5k4r[aacute]t.
5s4to5k4r[aacute]t.
5t4[lcaron]4c4[tcaron].
akci3a2
akv[aacute]ri3u2m
gymn[aacute]zi3um
le2u3k[eacute]mia
t2ri3u2mf
kli3e2nt
}

% end pattern data
